South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 4, Chapter 3, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-3-550.  (A) As used in this section, "personal information" has the meaning provided in 18 U.S.C. Section 2725. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall not disclose an individual's personal information in response to a request that does not fall within one of the exceptions listed in 18 U.S.C. 2721(b) without the express consent of the individual to whom such personal information pertains. (C) The department shall establish and carry out procedures under which the department, upon receiving a request for personal information that does not fall within one of the exceptions listed in 18 U.S.C. Section 2721(b), shall mail a copy of the request to the individual about whom the information was requested, informing such individual of the request, together with a statement to the effect that the information will not be released unless the individual waives his right to privacy under 18 U.S.C. Section 2721. SECTION 2.  The waiver procedures required under this act must be established and implemented by the Department of Motor Vehicles within sixty days after the effective date of this act. The department shall notify the General Assembly in writing no later than the sixtieth day from the effective date of this act that it has complied with this requirement and provide copies of the waiver procedures established under this act. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----